Massachusetts, session 194th, H1549.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 40B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by adding the following new section at the end thereof:- 
Section X, Any municipality which is so ordered by the Federal Government or by the 
Commonwealth through the Department of Housing and Economic Development, the 
Department of Housing, or any other state or federal agency to provide an emergency shelter site 
for homeless populations greater than 10 individuals within its borders shall be granted 'safe 
harbor' from meeting the regulations and requirements of Chapter 40B namely including the 
Commonwealth’s Subsidized Housing Inventory requirement threshold of 10%, for a period of 
not less than 5 years